Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.501 and 2025 c 371 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall supervise the following individuals who are sentenced to probation in superior court, pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or 9.95.210:(a) Individuals convicted of:(i) Sexual misconduct with a minor second degree;(ii) Custodial sexual misconduct second degree;(iii) Communication with a minor for immoral purposes; and(iv) Violation of RCW 9A.44.132(2) (failure to register); and(b) Individuals who have:(i) A current conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense after August 1, 2011; and(ii) A prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or domestic violence felony offense after August 1, 2011.(2) Individuals convicted of misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenses supervised by the department pursuant to this section shall be placed on community custody.(3) The department shall supervise every individual convicted of a felony and sentenced to community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701 or 9.94A.702 whose risk assessment classifies the individual as one who is at a high risk to reoffend.(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department shall supervise an individual sentenced to community custody regardless of risk classification if the individual:(a) Has a current conviction for a sex offense or a serious violent offense and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701, 9.94A.702, or 9.94A.507;(b) Has been identified by the department as a dangerous mentally ill offender pursuant to RCW 72.09.370;(c) Has an indeterminate sentence and is subject to parole pursuant to RCW 9.95.017;(d) Has a current conviction for violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) and was sentenced to a term of community custody pursuant to RCW 9.94A.701;(e)(i) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony offense after August 1, 2011, and a prior conviction for a repetitive domestic violence offense or domestic violence felony offense after August 1, 2011. This subsection (4)(e)(i) applies only to offenses committed prior to July 24, 2015;(ii) Has a current conviction for a domestic violence felony offense. The state and its officers, agents, and employees shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for its supervision of an individual under this subsection (4)(e)(ii) unless the state and its officers, agents, and employees acted with gross negligence;(f) Was sentenced under RCW 9.94A.650, 9.94A.655, 9.94A.660, 9.94A.670, 9.94A.711, 9.94A.695, or 9.94A.661;(g) Is subject to supervision pursuant to RCW 9.94A.745; or(h) Was convicted and sentenced under RCW 46.61.520 (vehicular homicide), RCW 46.61.522 (vehicular assault), RCW 46.61.502(6) (felony DUI), or RCW 46.61.504(6) (felony physical control).(5) The department shall supervise any individual released by the indeterminate sentence review board who was sentenced to community custody or subject to community custody under the terms of release.(6) The department shall supervise any individual granted conditional commutation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.885.(7) The department shall supervise any individual convicted of RCW 9A.46.110 (stalking).(8) The department is not authorized to, and may not, supervise any individual sentenced to a term of community custody or any probationer unless the individual or probationer is one for whom supervision is required under this section.(((8)))(9) The department shall conduct a risk assessment for every individual convicted of a felony and sentenced to a term of community custody who may be subject to supervision under this section.(((9)))(10) The period of time the department is authorized to supervise an individual under this section may not exceed the duration of community custody specified under RCW 9.94B.050, 9.94A.701 (1) through (9), or 9.94A.702, except in cases where the court has imposed an exceptional term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.535 and where the governor imposes a term of community custody as a condition of conditional commutation or imposes an additional term of community custody due to a violation of conditional commutation.(((10)))(11) The period of time the department is authorized to supervise an individual under this section may be reduced by the earned award of supervision compliance credit pursuant to RCW 9.94A.717.--- END ---